Utah statutes.
63M-1-1219.   Transfer and registration of certificates.

(1)  A certificate and the related contingent tax credit may be transferred by the designated investor.

(2)  The board, in conjunction with the State Tax Commission, shall develop:

(a)  a system for registration of any certificate and related contingent tax credit issued or transferred under this part; and

(b)  a system that permits verification that:

(i)  any contingent tax credit claimed is valid; and

(ii)  any transfers of the certificate and related contingent tax credit are made in accordance with the requirements of this part.

(3)  A certificate or contingent tax credit issued or transferred under this part may not be considered a security under Title 61, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Securities Act.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

